Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.085

Personnel and supplies—Reimbursement.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall furnish to regional committees the services of employed personnel and the materials and supplies necessary to enable them to perform the duties imposed upon them by this chapter.

(2) Costs that may be incurred by an educational service district in association with school district negotiations under RCW 28A.315.195 and supporting the regional committee under RCW 28A.315.205 shall be reimbursed by the state from such funds as are appropriated for these purposes.

[ 2008 c 159 s 3; 2006 c 263 s 507; 2005 c 497 s 405; 1999 c 315 s 206.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.